Washington statutes.
RCW 18.53.050

License renewal.

Every licensed optometrist shall renew his or her license by complying with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined according to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 1996 c 191 s 29; 1991 c 3 s 134; 1985 c 7 s 51; 1983 c 168 s 8; 1981 c 277 s 8; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 56; 1971 ex.s. c 266 s 10; 1955 c 275 s 1; 1919 c 144 s 13; RRS s 10158.]